Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 7. Ownership.

Sec. 06.26.450.
Acquisition of control.

Except as expressly otherwise permitted under this chapter, a person may not, without the prior written approval of the department, directly or indirectly acquire control of a trust company through a change in a legal or beneficial interest in voting securities of a trust company or a corporation or other person who owns voting securities of a trust company.

This section does not apply to

the acquisition of securities in connection with the exercise of a security or other interest in full or partial satisfaction of a debt previously contracted for in good faith if the acquiring person files written notice of acquisition with the department before the person votes the securities acquired;

the acquisition of voting securities in any class or series by a person in control who has previously complied with and received approval to acquire control under AS

06.26.450

—

06.26.480

or who was identified as a person in control in an earlier application filed with and approved by the department;

an acquisition or transfer by operation of law, a will, or intestate succession if the acquiring person files written notice of acquisition with the department before the person votes the securities acquired; or

a transaction exempted by the department by regulation or order because the transaction is not within the purposes of AS

06.26.450

—

06.26.480

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For ownership, see 3 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 06.26.460.
Application for acquisition of control.

A proposed transferee seeking approval under AS

06.26.450

to acquire control of a trust company shall file with the department

an application in the form prescribed by the department;

the filing fee established by the department by regulation; and

all information required by regulation or that the department requires for a particular application in order to make an informed decision to approve or reject the proposed acquisition.

If the proposed transferee under (a) of this section includes a group of persons acting together, the department may require each member of the group to provide information to the department.

If the proposed transferee is not a resident of the state, a corporation organized under AS 10.06, or a foreign corporation qualified under AS 10.06 to transact business in this state, the proposed transferee shall file with the department a written consent to service of process on a resident of this state for any court action arising out of or connected with the proposed acquisition of control.

Promptly after the department accepts the application as complete, the proposed transferee shall publish notice of the application, the date of filing the application, and the identity of each participant in the acquisition of control in the form specified by the department in a newspaper of general circulation published in the community proposed as the trust company’s principal place of business. If a newspaper of general circulation is not published in the community, the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation near the community. Publication of notice of an application may be deferred for up to 31 days after the date the application is filed if

the proposed transferee requests confidential treatment and represents that a public announcement of the tender offer and the filing of appropriate forms with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the appropriate federal banking agency, as applicable, will occur within the period of deferral; and

the department determines that public interest will not be harmed by the requested confidential treatment.

The department may waive the requirement that a notice be published or permit delayed publication of the notice if the department makes a written determination that waiver or delay is in the public interest.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For ownership, see 3 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 06.26.470.
Decision on application for acquisition of control.

The department shall approve or deny an application for acquisition of control not later than the 60th day after the date that the notice regarding acquisition of control is published under AS

06.26.460

.

If the department approves an application filed under AS

06.26.460

, the applicant may acquire control. Any written commitment from the proposed transferee offered to and accepted by the department as a condition for approval of the application is enforceable against the trust company and the transferee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.480.
Objection to other transfer.

AS

06.26.450

—

06.26.480

may not be construed to prevent the department from investigating, commenting on, or seeking to enjoin or set aside a transfer of voting securities that evidence a direct or indirect interest in a trust company if the department considers the transfer to be against the public interest.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)